Texas, session 891, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 152.0971(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The juvenile board of Grayson County is composed of the county judge and the district judges in Grayson County. The county judge may add a judge of a county court at law to the board. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.